Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Chapter 30. Consistency with Local Government Plans and Ordinances.

Sec. 35.30.010.
Review and approval by local planning authorities.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, before commencing construction of a public project,

if the project is located in a municipality, the department shall submit the plans for the project to the planning commission of the municipality for review and approval;

if the project is located within two miles of a village, the department shall submit the plans to the village council for review and comment;

if the project is located within one-half mile of the boundary of an area represented by a community council established by municipal charter or ordinance, the department shall submit the plans to the community council for review and comment.

Prior approval by a municipal planning commission may not be required before the commencement of construction of a highway or local service road if

the department and the municipality have entered into agreement for the planning of the project under AS

19.20.060

or

19.20.070

and the plans for the project are completed in accordance with the terms of that agreement;

the municipality has adopted a municipal master highway plan under AS

19.20.080

and the highway or local service road is consistent with the plan adopted; or

the department has entered into agreement with the municipality for the planning of transportation corridors under AS

19.20.015

and the plans for the project are completed in accordance with the provisions of that agreement.

If final disapproval by resolution of the governing body of the affected municipality or village is not received within 90 days from the date the project was submitted to the municipality or village, the department may proceed with the project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 143 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 100 SLA 1988)

Sec. 35.30.020.
Compliance with municipal ordinances.

A department shall comply with local planning and zoning ordinances and other regulations in the same manner and to the same extent as other landowners.

History.

(§ 3 ch 143 SLA 1977)

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is no irreconcilable conflict between this section and AS 02.25 et seq. (regarding airport zoning) because they can be harmonized. This section may be read as requiring all state departments to comply with local planning and zoning ordinances in the same manner and to the same extent as other landowners with the exception of planning and zoning for state-owned airports. However, if the conflict is considered irreconcilable, then the special statute (AS 02.25 et seq.) prevails over the more general (this section). October 24, 1996 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 35.30.030.
Waiver.

If a department clearly demonstrates an overriding state interest, waiver of local planning authority approval and the compliance requirement may be granted by the governor.
The governor shall issue specific findings giving reasons for granting any waiver under this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 143 SLA 1977)

Sec. 35.30.040.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“public project” means a public building or other structure, public work, or other facility, highway, or local service road constructed or maintained by a department; the term includes the acquisition by purchase or agreement of land and rights in land for materials and the extraction or removal of materials necessary for completion of a highway under AS

19.05.080

—

19.05.120

;

“village” means an unincorporated community of the unorganized borough where at least 25 people reside as a social unit.

History.

(§ 3 ch 143 SLA 1977; am § 57 ch 14 SLA 1987)